Alabama, session 2026rs, SB277.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
17 Section 1. Sections 10A-17-1.01 through 10A-17-1.18,
18 Code of Alabama 1975, inclusive, are designated as Article 1.
19 Section 2. Article 2, commencing with Section
20 10A-17-2.01, is added to Chapter 17 of Title 10A of the Code
21 of Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
22 §10A-17-2.01
23 This article together with applicable provisions of
24 Chapter 1 shall be known and may be cited as the Decentralized
25 Unincorporated Nonprofit Association Law.
26 §10A-17-2.02
27 For the purposes of this article, the following terms
28 have the following meanings:
Page 1

have the following meanings:
SB277 Enrolled
29 (1) ADMINISTRATOR. A person authorized by the members
30 of a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association to
31 fulfill administrative or operational tasks at the direction
32 of the membership.
33 (2) DECENTRALIZED UNINCORPORATED NONPROFIT ASSOCIATION
34 or NONPROFIT ASSOCIATION. An unincorporated nonprofit
35 association that meets the following requirements:
36 a. Consists of at least 100 members joined by mutual
37 consent in digital activity under an agreement, which may be
38 in writing or inferred from conduct, for a common nonprofit
39 purpose, including, but not limited to, administering the
40 affairs of a distributed ledger technology or network of smart
41 contracts.
42 b. Has elected to be formed under this article.
43 c. Is not formed under any other law governing the
44 nonprofit association's organization or operation.
45 (3) DIGITAL ASSET. A representation of economic,
46 proprietary, or access rights that is stored in a computer
47 readable format and is either a digital consumer asset,
48 digital security, or virtual currency.
49 (4) DISTRIBUTED LEDGER TECHNOLOGY. A distributed ledger
50 protocol and supporting infrastructure, including blockchain,
51 which uses a distributed, shared, and replicated ledger,
52 whether public or private, permissioned or permissionless, and
53 which may include the use of digital assets as a medium of
54 electronic exchange.
55 (5) ESTABLISHED PRACTICES. The practices used by a
56 decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association without
Page 2

decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association without
SB277 Enrolled
57 material change during the most recent five years of the
58 nonprofit association's existence, or if the nonprofit
59 association has existed for less than five years, during the
60 nonprofit association's entire existence.
61 (6) GOVERNING PRINCIPLES. All agreements and any
62 amendment or restatement of those agreements, including any
63 decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association agreements,
64 consensus formation algorithms, smart contracts, or enacted
65 governance proposals, which govern the purpose or operation of
66 a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association and the
67 rights and obligations of the nonprofit association's members
68 and administrators, whether contained in a record, implied
69 from the nonprofit association's established practices, or
70 both.
71 (7) MEMBER. A person who, under the governing
72 principles of a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
73 association, may participate in the selection of the
74 decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association's
75 administrators or the development of the policies and
76 activities of the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
77 association.
78 (8) MEMBERSHIP INTEREST. A member's voting rights in a
79 decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association determined
80 by the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association's
81 governing principles, including as ascertained from
82 decentralized ledger technology on which the decentralized
83 unincorporated nonprofit association relies to determine a
84 member's voting rights.
Page 3

member's voting rights.
SB277 Enrolled
85 (9) NONPROFIT PURPOSE. Any purpose for which a
86 nonprofit corporation could be organized under Article 1, and
87 where no part of income or profit is distributable to its
88 members or administrators.
89 (10) PERSON. An individual, corporation, business
90 trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, agency, joint
91 venture, government, governmental subdivision or
92 instrumentality, or any other legal commercial entity.
93 (11) RECORD. Information that is inscribed on a
94 tangible medium or stored in an electronic or other medium
95 that is retrievable in perceivable form.
96 (12) SMART CONTRACT. An automated transaction, as
97 defined in any substantially similar analogue or code, script,
98 or programming language relying on distributed ledger
99 technology, including blockchain, which may include
100 facilitating and instructing transfers of an asset,
101 administrating membership interest votes with respect to a
102 decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association, or issuing
103 executable instructions for these actions based on the
104 occurrence or nonoccurrence of specified conditions.
105 (13) STATE. A state of the United States, the District
106 of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or any territory
107 or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the
108 United States.
109 §10A-17-2.03
110 (a) The law of this state governs any decentralized
111 unincorporated nonprofit association that is formed in this
112 state.
Page 4

state.
SB277 Enrolled
113 (b) Each decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
114 association's governing principles shall identify the
115 jurisdiction in which the decentralized unincorporated
116 nonprofit association is formed.
117 §10A-17-2.04
118 (a) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
119 association may engage in profit-making activities. Profits
120 from any activities shall be used in furtherance of, or set
121 aside for, the nonprofit association's common nonprofit
122 purpose.
123 (b) Except as provided in subsection (c), a
124 decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association may not
125 make distributions to its members or administrators.
126 (c) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
127 association may do all of the following:
128 (1) Pay reasonable compensation or reimburse reasonable
129 expenses to its members, administrators, and persons outside
130 of the nonprofit association for services rendered, including
131 with respect to the administration and operation of the
132 nonprofit association, which may include the provision of
133 collateral for the self-insurance of the nonprofit
134 association, voting, or participation in the nonprofit
135 association's operations and activities.
136 (2) Confer benefits on its members and administrators
137 in conformity with its common nonprofit purpose.
138 (3) Repurchase membership interests to the extent
139 authorized by the nonprofit association's governing
140 principles.
Page 5

principles.
SB277 Enrolled
141 (4) Make distributions of property to members upon
142 winding up and termination of the decentralized unincorporated
143 nonprofit association to the extent permitted by Section
144 10A-17-2.26.
145 §10A-17-2.05
146 (a) Unless prohibited or otherwise limited by its
147 written rules or governing documents, a decentralized
148 unincorporated nonprofit association in its name may acquire,
149 hold, encumber, or transfer an estate or interest in real or
150 personal property.
151 (b) Unless prohibited or otherwise limited by its
152 written rules or governing documents, a decentralized
153 unincorporated nonprofit association may be a legatee,
154 devisee, or beneficiary of a trust or contract.
155 (c) Real and personal property in Alabama may be
156 acquired, held, encumbered, and transferred by a decentralized
157 unincorporated nonprofit association, whether it or a member
158 has any other relationship to Alabama.
159 §10A-17-2.06
160 (a) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
161 association shall execute and record a statement of authority
162 to transfer an estate or interest in real property in the name
163 of the nonprofit association.
164 (b) An estate or interest in real property in the name
165 of a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association may be
166 transferred by a person so authorized in a statement of
167 authority recorded in the office of the judge of probate of
168 the county in which the real property is located.
Page 6

the county in which the real property is located.
SB277 Enrolled
169 (c) A statement of authority shall set forth:
170 (1) The name of the decentralized unincorporated
171 nonprofit association;
172 (2) The address in Alabama, including the street
173 address, if any, of the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
174 association, or, if the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
175 association does not have an address in Alabama, its address
176 out of state;
177 (3) The name or title of a person authorized to
178 transfer an estate or interest in real property held in the
179 name of the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
180 association; and
181 (4) The action, procedure, or vote of the decentralized
182 unincorporated nonprofit association which authorizes the
183 person to transfer the real property of the decentralized
184 unincorporated nonprofit association and which authorizes the
185 person to execute the statement of authority.
186 (d) A statement of authority shall be executed and
187 recorded in the same manner as a deed by a person who is not
188 the person authorized to transfer the estate or interest.
189 (e) The judge of probate shall collect a fee for
190 recording a statement of authority in accordance with Article
191 4 of Chapter 1.
192 (f) An amendment, including a cancellation, of a
193 statement of authority shall meet the requirements for
194 execution and recording, and be accompanied by payment of the
195 same recording fee payable to and for the judge of probate, of
196 an original statement. Unless canceled earlier, a recorded
Page 7

an original statement. Unless canceled earlier, a recorded
SB277 Enrolled
197 statement of authority as amended is canceled by operation of
198 law five years after the date of the most recent amended
199 statement of authority.
200 (g) If the record title to real property is in the name
201 of a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association and
202 the statement of authority is recorded in the office of the
203 judge of probate of the county in which the real property is
204 located, the authority of the person named in a statement of
205 authority is conclusive in favor of a person who gives value
206 without notice that the person lacks authority.
207 §10A-17-2.07
208 (a) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
209 association is a legal entity separate from its members for
210 the purposes of determining and enforcing rights, duties, and
211 liabilities in contract and tort.
212 (b) A person is not liable for a breach of a
213 decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association's contract
214 merely because the person is a member, administrator,
215 authorized to participate in the management of the affairs of
216 the nonprofit association, or considered a member by the
217 nonprofit association.
218 (c) A person is not liable for a tortious act or
219 omission for which a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
220 association is liable merely because the person is a member or
221 administrator of the nonprofit association, authorized to
222 participate in the management of the affairs of the nonprofit
223 association, or considered a member by the nonprofit
224 association.
Page 8

association.
SB277 Enrolled
225 (d) A tortious act or omission of a member,
226 administrator, or other person for which a decentralized
227 unincorporated nonprofit association is liable is not imputed
228 to a person merely because the person is a member or
229 administrator of the nonprofit association, authorized to
230 participate in the management of the affairs of the nonprofit
231 association, or considered a member by the nonprofit
232 association.
233 (e) A member, administrator, person authorized to
234 participate in the management of the affairs of the nonprofit
235 association, or person considered a member by the nonprofit
236 association may assert a claim against the decentralized
237 unincorporated nonprofit association. A decentralized
238 unincorporated nonprofit association may assert a claim
239 against a member, administrator, person authorized to
240 participate in the management of the affairs of the nonprofit
241 association, or person considered a member by the nonprofit
242 association.
243 §10A-17-2.08
244 (a) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
245 association, in its own name, may institute, defend,
246 intervene, or participate in a judicial, administrative, or
247 other governmental proceeding or in an arbitration, mediation,
248 or any other form of alternative dispute resolution.
249 (b) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
250 association may assert a claim on behalf of its members if all
251 of the following apply:
252 (1) One or more members of the nonprofit association
Page 9

(1) One or more members of the nonprofit association
SB277 Enrolled
253 have standing to assert a claim in their own right.
254 (2) The interests the nonprofit association seeks to
255 protect are germane to the nonprofit association's purposes.
256 (3) Neither the claim asserted, nor the relief
257 requested, requires the participation of a member.
258 §10A-17-2.09
259 A judgment or order against a decentralized
260 unincorporated nonprofit association is not by itself a
261 judgment or order against a member or administrator of the
262 nonprofit association.
263 §10A-17-2.10
264 (a) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
265 association may deliver to the Secretary of State for filing a
266 statement appointing an agent authorized to receive service of
267 process.
268 (b) A statement appointing an agent shall set forth:
269 (1) The name of the nonprofit association;
270 (2) The address in Alabama, including the street
271 address, if any, of the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
272 association, or, if the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
273 association does not have an address in Alabama, its address
274 out of state; and
275 (3) The name of the person in Alabama authorized to
276 receive service of process and the person's address, including
277 the street address, in Alabama.
278 (c) A statement appointing an agent shall be signed and
279 acknowledged by a person authorized to manage the affairs of
280 the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association. The
Page 10

the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association. The
SB277 Enrolled
281 statement shall also be signed and acknowledged by the person
282 appointed agent, who thereby accepts appointment.
283 (d) The appointed agent may resign by delivering to the
284 Secretary of State for filing a resignation, and by giving
285 notice to the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
286 association. The appointment of the agent shall terminate upon
287 the expiration of 30 days after the Secretary of State has
288 filed the resignation.
289 (e) The Secretary of State may collect a fee for filing
290 a statement appointing an agent to receive service of process,
291 an amendment, or a resignation in the amount charged for
292 filing similar documents for nonprofit corporations.
293 (f) An amendment to a statement appointing an agent to
294 receive service of process shall meet the requirements for
295 execution of an original statement.
296 §10A-17-2.11
297 In an action or proceeding against a decentralized
298 unincorporated nonprofit association, a summons and complaint
299 shall be served on the agent authorized by appointment in
300 Section 10A-17-2.10 to receive service of process, on a person
301 authorized to administer the affairs of the nonprofit
302 association, or in any manner otherwise provided in the
303 Alabama Rules of Civil Procedure. If, after reasonable efforts
304 to accomplish service through the methods provided in this
305 section, service cannot be accomplished, then service may be
306 made on a member of the nonprofit association.
307 §10A-17-2.12
308 A claim for relief against a decentralized
Page 11

A claim for relief against a decentralized
SB277 Enrolled
309 unincorporated nonprofit association shall not abate merely
310 because of a change in its members or persons authorized to
311 administer the affairs of the nonprofit association.
312 §10A-17-2.13
313 Venue shall be:
314 (1) As provided in Section 6-3-6; or
315 (2) The county in which the agent authorized to receive
316 service of process under Section 10A-17-2.10 resides.
317 §10A-17-2.14
318 (a) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
319 association shall have perpetual existence unless its
320 governing principles otherwise specify.
321 (b) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
322 association may be dissolved as follows:
323 (1) If the governing principles of the nonprofit
324 association provide a time or method for dissolution, by that
325 method.
326 (2) If the governing principles of the nonprofit
327 association do not provide a method for dissolution, by
328 approval of its members pursuant to Section 10A-17-2.20.
329 (3) If membership in the decentralized unincorporated
330 nonprofit association falls below 100 members and the
331 decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association does not
332 meet the requirements of Sections 10A-17-2.01 through
333 10A-17-2.15. In the event membership in the nonprofit
334 association falls below 100 members and the nonprofit
335 association meets the requirements of Sections 10A-17-2.01
336 through 10A-17-2.15, the entity shall automatically transition
Page 12

through 10A-17-2.15, the entity shall automatically transition
SB277 Enrolled
337 to an Alabama unincorporated nonprofit association unless the
338 governing principles otherwise specify.
339 (4) By court order.
340 (c) After dissolution, a decentralized unincorporated
341 nonprofit association continues in existence until its
342 activities are wound up and terminated pursuant to Section
343 10A-17-2.26.
344 §10A-17-2.15
345 (a)(1) A person may become a member of a decentralized
346 unincorporated nonprofit association in accordance with the
347 governing principles of that decentralized unincorporated
348 nonprofit association.
349 (2) If there are no applicable governing principles, a
350 person shall be considered a member upon the purchase or
351 assumption of ownership of a membership interest.
352 (3) A person shall continue as a member absent the
353 person's suspension, dismissal, or expulsion pursuant to
354 subsection (b), resignation pursuant to Section 10A-17-2.16,
355 or the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association's
356 dissolution and winding-up pursuant to this article.
357 (b) Subject to the governing principles of the
358 decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association, a member
359 may be suspended, dismissed, or expelled. If there are no
360 applicable governing principles, a member may be suspended,
361 dismissed, or expelled by approval of the membership in
362 accordance with Section 10A-17-2.20.
363 (c) Unless otherwise provided for in the governing
364 principles, suspension, dismissal, or expulsion of a member
Page 13

principles, suspension, dismissal, or expulsion of a member
SB277 Enrolled
365 does not relieve the member of any obligation incurred, or
366 commitment made by the member, before the suspension,
367 dismissal, or expulsion.
368 §10A-17-2.16
369 (a)(1) A member may resign as a member of a
370 decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association in
371 accordance with the governing principles of that decentralized
372 unincorporated nonprofit association.
373 (2) If there are no applicable governing principles, a
374 member shall be deemed to have resigned as a member upon the
375 disposal, whether voluntary or involuntary, of all membership
376 interests or other property or instruments that confer upon
377 the person a voting right within the nonprofit association.
378 (b) Unless otherwise provided for in the governing
379 principles, resignation of a member does not relieve the
380 member of any obligation incurred or commitment made by the
381 member before the resignation.
382 §10A-17-2.17
383 (a) Unless otherwise provided for in the governing
384 principles, a member shall not have any fiduciary duty to a
385 decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association or to any
386 other member of the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
387 association merely by reason of being a member.
388 (b) A member acting on behalf of the decentralized
389 unincorporated nonprofit association shall discharge his or
390 her duties in a manner the member reasonably believes to be in
391 the best interest of the nonprofit association.
392 §10A-17-2.18
Page 14

§10A-17-2.18
SB277 Enrolled
393 (a) A member is not an agent of a decentralized
394 unincorporated nonprofit association merely by being a member.
395 (b) A person's status as a member does not prevent or
396 restrict laws other than this article from imposing liability
397 on a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association
398 because of a member's conduct.
399 §10A-17-2.19
400 Except as otherwise provided in the decentralized
401 unincorporated nonprofit association's governing principles, a
402 member's interest or any right granted pursuant to the
403 governing principles is freely transferable to another person
404 through conveyance of the membership interest.
405 §10A-17-2.20
406 (a) Except as otherwise provided in the governing
407 principles, a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
408 association shall have the approval of a majority of the
409 membership interests participating in a vote to do any of the
410 following:
411 (1) Suspend, dismiss, or expel a member.
412 (2) Select or dismiss an administrator.
413 (3) Adopt, amend, or repeal the governing principles.
414 (4) Sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of the
415 property of the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
416 association.
417 (5) Dissolve the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
418 association under Section 10A-17-2.14.
419 (6) Undertake any other act outside of the ordinary
420 course of the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
Page 15

course of the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
SB277 Enrolled
421 association's activities.
422 (7) Determine the policy and purpose of the
423 decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association.
424 (b) In order to perform any act or exercise any right
425 that the governing principles require to be approved by the
426 membership, a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
427 association must have the approval of the membership to act in
428 accordance with its governing principles.
429 (c) Unless otherwise provided for in the governing
430 principles, membership interest in a decentralized
431 unincorporated nonprofit association shall be calculated in
432 proportion to a member's voting rights within the nonprofit
433 association.
434 §10A-17-2.21
435 (a) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
436 association may provide for its governance, in whole or in
437 part, through distributed ledger technology including, but not
438 limited to, smart contracts.
439 (b) The governing principles for a decentralized
440 unincorporated nonprofit association may include, but not be
441 limited to, the following provisions:
442 (1) Specify whether any distributed ledger technology
443 used or enabled by the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
444 association will be fully immutable or subject to change by
445 the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association and
446 whether any distributed ledger will be fully or partially
447 public or private, including the extent of a member's access
448 to information.
Page 16

to information.
SB277 Enrolled
449 (2) Adopt voting procedures, which may include smart
450 contracts deployed to distributed ledger technology and which
451 may provide for all of the following:
452 a. Proposals from members or administrators in the
453 decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association for
454 upgrades, modifications, or additions to software systems or
455 protocols.
456 b. Other proposed changes to the decentralized
457 unincorporated nonprofit association's governing principles.
458 c. Any other matters of governance or activities within
459 the purpose of the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
460 association.
461 §10A-17-2.22
462 In accordance with its governing principles, a
463 decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association may do both
464 of the following:
465 (1) Adopt any reasonable algorithmic means for
466 establishing consensus for the validation of records, as well
467 as for establishing requirements, processes, and procedures
468 for conducting operations or making organizational decisions
469 with respect to the distributed ledger technology used by the
470 nonprofit association.
471 (2) In accordance with any procedure specified pursuant
472 to Section 10A-17-2.21, modify the consensus mechanism, as
473 well as the requirements, processes, and procedures or
474 substitute a new consensus mechanism, requirements, processes,
475 or procedures that comply with this state's law and the
476 governing principles of the nonprofit association.
Page 17

governing principles of the nonprofit association.
SB277 Enrolled
477 §10A-17-2.23
478 (a) Unless otherwise provided for in the decentralized
479 unincorporated nonprofit association's governing principles,
480 the members of the nonprofit association may select the
481 nonprofit association's administrators in accordance with
482 Section 10A-17-2.20.
483 (b) If no administrators are selected, none of the
484 members may be considered administrators for the decentralized
485 unincorporated nonprofit association.
486 (c) No decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
487 association shall be required to have an administrator, and
488 the rights and duties of all administrators shall be
489 established as part of the authorization of authority to act
490 as an administrator.
491 (d) If in a record, the governing principles of a
492 decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association may limit
493 or eliminate the liability of an administrator to the
494 decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association or its
495 members for money damages for any action taken, or failure to
496 take any action, as an administrator except liability for any
497 of the following:
498 (1) The amount of financial benefit improperly received
499 by an administrator.
500 (2) An intentional infliction of harm on the nonprofit
501 association or its members.
502 (3) An intentional violation of criminal law.
503 (4) Breach of the duty of loyalty should one exist,
504 unless, following full disclosure of all material facts to the
Page 18

unless, following full disclosure of all material facts to the
SB277 Enrolled
505 nonprofit association members, the specific act or transaction
506 that would otherwise breach the duty of loyalty is authorized
507 or ratified by approval of the disinterested members pursuant
508 to Section 10A-17-2.20.
509 (5) Improper distributions.
510 §10A-17-2.24
511 (a) Except as provided by subsection (b), on reasonable
512 notice, a member or administrator of a decentralized
513 unincorporated nonprofit association is entitled to an
514 electronic record of any record maintained by the nonprofit
515 association regarding the nonprofit association's activities,
516 financial condition, and other circumstances, to the extent
517 the information is material to the member's or administrator's
518 rights and duties under the decentralized unincorporated
519 nonprofit association's governing principles or this article.
520 (b) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
521 association is not obligated to provide records requested from
522 a member or administrator if access to the information is
523 contained in a record available to the member or administrator
524 in a medium available to the member, including distributed
525 ledger technology.
526 (c)(1) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
527 association may impose reasonable restrictions on access to
528 and use of information that may be provided under this
529 section, including by designating the information confidential
530 and imposing nondisclosure or other safeguarding obligations
531 on the recipient of the information.
532 (2) In a dispute concerning the reasonableness of a
Page 19

(2) In a dispute concerning the reasonableness of a
SB277 Enrolled
533 restriction under this subsection, the decentralized
534 unincorporated nonprofit association shall have the burden of
535 proving reasonableness.
536 (d) A former member or administrator may have access to
537 information to which the former member or administrator was
538 entitled to as a member or administrator if all of the
539 following apply:
540 (1) The information relates to the period of time
541 during which the former member or administrator was a member
542 or administrator.
543 (2) The former member or administrator seeks the
544 information in good faith.
545 (3) The former member or administrator satisfies the
546 requirements of subsections (a) through (c) with respect to
547 the information.
548 (e) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
549 association shall not be obligated to collect and maintain a
550 list of members or information on an individual member,
551 including the names or addresses of members.
552 §10A-17-2.25
553 (a) Unless otherwise provided in its governing
554 principles, a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
555 association may reimburse a member or administrator for
556 authorized expenses reasonably incurred on behalf of the
557 nonprofit association.
558 (b) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
559 association may indemnify a member or administrator for any
560 debt, obligation, or other liability incurred in the course of
Page 20

debt, obligation, or other liability incurred in the course of
SB277 Enrolled
561 the member or administrator's activities on behalf of the
562 nonprofit association. To be eligible for indemnification, an
563 administrator must have complied with the duties stated in
564 Section 10A-17-2.23. If in a record, a nonprofit association's
565 governing principles may broaden or limit this right of
566 indemnification.
567 (c) If a person is made or threatened to be made a
568 party in a proceeding based on that person's conduct in the
569 affairs of a decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
570 association, that person is entitled, upon written request to
571 the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association,
572 including through distributed ledger technology, to receive
573 payment of or reimbursement by the nonprofit association, of
574 reasonable expenses, including attorney fees and
575 disbursements, incurred by that person in advance of the final
576 disposition of the proceeding. To be entitled to these
577 payments or advances, the person making the request shall make
578 a written affirmation that the person has a good faith belief
579 that the criteria for indemnification in subsection (b) has
580 been satisfied and that the person will repay the amounts paid
581 or reimbursed if it is determined that the criteria for
582 reimbursement has not been satisfied. No payment or
583 reimbursement under this subsection shall be made without
584 prior approval, in a record, of the disinterested members
585 under Section 10A-17-2.20.
586 (d) A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
587 association may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of a
588 member or administrator for liability asserted against or
Page 21

member or administrator for liability asserted against or
SB277 Enrolled
589 incurred by the member or administrator in that capacity, even
590 if the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association
591 would not have the power to indemnify or advance expenses to
592 the member or administrator against the same liability under
593 this section.
594 (e) These rights of reimbursement, indemnification, and
595 advancement of expense apply to former members or
596 administrators for activities undertaken on behalf of the
597 decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association while they
598 were members or administrators.
599 §10A-17-2.26
600 (a) A dissolved decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
601 association shall wind up its operations and may continue
602 after dissolution only for the purpose of winding up.
603 (b) In winding up a decentralized unincorporated
604 nonprofit association, the members shall discharge the
605 decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association's debts,
606 obligations, and other liabilities, settle and close the
607 decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association's business,
608 and distribute any remaining property as follows:
609 (1) To another entity or person with similar nonprofit
610 purposes, if required by law other than this article.
611 (2) In accordance with the decentralized unincorporated
612 nonprofit association's governing principles. In the absence
613 of applicable governing principles, to the current members of
614 the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association in
615 proportion to their membership interests.
616 (3) If neither subdivision (1) or (2) applies, in
Page 22

(3) If neither subdivision (1) or (2) applies, in
SB277 Enrolled
617 accordance with the law of unclaimed property contained in
618 Article 2A, Chapter 12 of Title 35, Code of Alabama 1975.
619 (c) In winding up a decentralized unincorporated
620 nonprofit association, the members may do all of the
621 following:
622 (1) Authorize an administrator to wind up the
623 decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association in
624 accordance with Section 10A-17-2.14. Any authorized
625 administrator shall owe the nonprofit association a duty of
626 care in the conduct or winding up of the decentralized
627 unincorporated nonprofit association to refrain from grossly
628 negligent or reckless conduct, willful or intentional
629 misconduct, or a knowing violation of the law.
630 (2) Preserve the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
631 association's operations and property as a going concern for a
632 reasonable time.
633 (3) Prosecute and defend actions and proceedings,
634 whether civil, criminal, or administrative.
635 (4) Transfer the decentralized unincorporated nonprofit
636 association's property.
637 (5) Settle disputes by mediation or arbitration.
638 (6) Perform other acts necessary or appropriate to the
639 winding up.
640 (d) If the members of a decentralized unincorporated
641 nonprofit association do not appoint an administrator or
642 administrators to wind up the decentralized unincorporated
643 nonprofit association, the members shall owe the decentralized
644 unincorporated nonprofit association a duty of care in the
Page 23

unincorporated nonprofit association a duty of care in the
SB277 Enrolled
645 conduct or winding up of the decentralized unincorporated
646 nonprofit association's operations to refrain from engaging in
647 grossly negligent or reckless conduct, willful or intentional
648 misconduct, or a knowing violation of the law.
649 §10A-17-2.27
650 A decentralized unincorporated nonprofit association
651 may effect a merger or conversion by complying with the
652 applicable provisions of Chapter 1 and its governing
653 principles.
654 §10A-17-2.28
655 Principles of law and equity supplement this chapter
656 unless displaced by a specific provision of this chapter.
657 Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
658 1, 2026.
Page 24

1, 2026.
SB277 Enrolled
659
660
661
662
663
664
665 ________________________________________________
666 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
667
668
669
670 ________________________________________________
671 Speaker of the House of Representatives
672
673
674 SB277
675 Senate 24-Feb-26
676 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
677 the Senate, as amended.
678
679 Patrick Harris,
680 Secretary.
681
682
683
684
685 House of Representatives
686 Passed: 12-Mar-26
687
688
689
690
691 By: Senator Bell
Page 25